Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6039.05
Paid dining assistant; nursing home; duties.

Each nursing home shall maintain (1) a record of all paid dining assistants employed by such facility, (2) verification of successful completion of a training course for each paid dining assistant, and (3) verification that the facility has made checks with the Nurse Aide Registry, the Adult Protective Services Central Registry, and the central register created in section 28-718, if applicable under section 71-6039.01, with respect to each paid dining assistant.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 119.